test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-jarplaan_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - jarplan e-stem lentokone: # Noun - full paradigm
     jarplaan+N+Sg+Nom: [jarplaan, jarplan]
     jarplaan+N+Sg+Gen: jarplaan
     jarplaan+N+Sg+Acc: jarplaan
     jarplaan+N+Sg+Ill: jarplaaʹne
     jarplaan+N+Sg+Loc: jarplaanâst
     jarplaan+N+Sg+Com: jarplaanin
     jarplaan+N+Ess: jarplaanen
     jarplaan+N+Par: jarplaaned
     jarplaan+N+Sg+Abe: [jarplaantaa, jarplaantää]
     jarplaan+N+Pl+Nom: jarplaan
     jarplaan+N+Pl+Gen: jarplaani
     jarplaan+N+Pl+Acc: jarplaanid
     jarplaan+N+Pl+Ill: jarplaanid
     jarplaan+N+Pl+Loc: jarplaanin
     jarplaan+N+Pl+Com: jarplaanivuiʹm
     jarplaan+N+Pl+Abe: [jarplaanitaa, jarplaanitää]
